Massachusetts, session 194th, S1214.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 266 of the general laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 49 the
following section:-
Section 49A.
“Motor vehicle key programming or emulating device” means any device, computer
program, application, or software designed or used to electronically communicate with a motor
vehicle for the purpose of programing or emulating a motor vehicle key fob that is capable of
being used to unlock or start the motor vehicle.
“Relay attack device” means any device, computer program, application, or software
designed to intercept the signal from the key fob of a motor vehicle to unlock to unlock or start
the motor vehicle.
of 2

No person shall, with intent to steal a motor vehicle or other property therefrom,
knowingly manufacture, sell, offer to sell, transfer, or possess a motor vehicle key programming
or emulating device or relay attack device.
No person shall, with intent to steal a motor vehicle or other property therefrom,
knowingly aid or permit another to use a motor vehicle key programming or emulating device or
relay attack device.
Whoever violates this section shall be punished by imprisonment in the state prison for
not more than ten years or by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars and imprisonment in
jail for not more than two and one half years.
of 2